Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.535

Transgender student policy and procedure—Healthy youth survey.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the health care authority, the department of health, and the liquor and cannabis board, must review and align the healthy youth survey with the model transgender student policy and procedure developed under RCW 28A.642.080.

[ 2019 c 194 s 3.]